Missouri, session 2026, HB1675.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto five new sections, to be
known as sections 376.2100, 376.2102, 376.2104, 376.2106, and 376.2108, to read as
follows:
376.2100. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1 of section 376.2108, as
used in sections 376.2100 to 376.2108, terms shall have the same meanings as are
ascribed to them under section 376.1350.
2. As used in sections 376.2100 to 376.2108, the term "evaluation period" shall
mean the first six months of the calendar year or the last six months of the calendar
year.
376.2102. 1. A health carrier or utilization review entity shall not require a
health care provider to obtain prior authorization for a health care service unless the
health carrier or utilization review entity makes a determination that in the most recent
evaluation period the health carrier or utilization review entity has approved or would
have approved less than ninety percent of the prior authorization requests submitted by
that provider for that health care service.
2. A health carrier or utilization review entity shall not require a health care
provider to obtain prior authorization for any health care services unless the health
carrier or utilization review entity makes a determination that in the most recent
evaluation period the health carrier or utilization review entity has approved or would
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1675 2
have approved less than ninety percent of all prior authorization requests submitted by
that provider for health care services.
3. In making a determination under this section, the health carrier or utilization
review entity shall not count any prior authorization requests denied by a health carrier
or utilization review entity and being appealed by the health care provider but shall
count as approved any prior authorization request that was denied by a health carrier
or utilization review entity but that was subsequently authorized.
376.2104. 1. The health carrier or utilization review entity shall notify the health
care provider no later than twenty-five days after the conclusion of the relevant
evaluation period of any determination made under section 376.2102. The notification
shall include the statistics, data, and any supporting documentation for making the
determination for the relevant evaluation period.
2. The health carrier or utilization review entity shall establish a process for
health care providers to appeal any determinations made under section 376.2102.
3. The health carrier or utilization review entity shall maintain an online portal
to allow health care providers to access all prior authorization decisions, including
determinations made under section 376.2102. For health care providers subject to prior
authorizations, the portal shall include the status of each prior authorization request, all
notifications to the health care provider, the dates the health care provider received such
notifications, and any other information relevant to the determination.
376.2106. No health carrier or utilization review entity shall deny or reduce
payment to a health care provider for a health care service for which the provider has a
prior authorization unless the provider:
(1) Knowingly and materially misrepresented the health care service in a request
for payment submitted to the health carrier or utilization review entity with the specific
intent to deceive and obtain an unlawful payment from the carrier or entity; or
(2) Failed to substantially perform the health care service.
376.2108. 1. The provisions of sections 376.2100 to 376.2108 shall not apply to
MO HealthNet, except that a Medicaid managed care organization as defined in section
208.431 shall be considered a health carrier for purposes of sections 376.2100 to
376.2108.
2. The provisions of sections 376.2100 to 376.2108 shall not apply to health care
providers who have not participated in a health benefit plan offered by the health
carrier for at least one full evaluation period.
3. Nothing in sections 376.2100 to 376.2108 shall be construed to:
(1) Authorize a health care provider to provide a health care service outside the
scope of his or her applicable license; or

HB 1675 3
(2) Require a health carrier or utilization review entity to pay for a health care
service described in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
✔